District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.06f

Composition and organization of the Water Quality Assurance Advisory Panel.

(a)

The Panel established under § 34-2202.06e shall be composed of 9 experts who, at a minimum, demonstrate knowledge in at least one of the following professional fields:

(1)

Water quality;

(2)

Water treatment;

(3)

Toxicology;

(4)

Public health;

(5)

Civil engineering; or

(6)

Environmental engineering.

(b)

Of the 9 Panel members, one shall be the General Manager or the General Manager’s designee, and one shall be a representative from the Washington Aqueduct.

(c)

Panel members shall be appointed by the Mayor in consultation with the General Manager and the Council.

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 206f
as added Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-240, § 2(b), 59 DCR 14790
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-240 added this section.